Georgia, session 2025_26, SB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
10 property owners' associations, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
11 "44-3-231.1.
12 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
13 (1) 'Lot' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 44-3-221.
14 (2) 'Lot owner' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 44-3-221.
15 (3) 'Property owners' association' or 'association' means a nongovernmental association
16 of participating members in a delineated area comprising a neighborhood or a group of
S. B. 315
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0085
17 homeowners and property owners, including, but not limited to, a homeowners'
18 association.
19 (b)(1) A prospective lot owner in a property owners' association shall be presented a
20 disclosure summary before executing the contract for sale. The disclosure summary shall
21 be substantially similar to the following form:
22 'DISCLOSURE SUMMARY
23 FOR (NAME OF PROPERTY OWNERS' ASSOCIATION)
24 (1) As a purchaser of property in this association, you shall be obligated to be a
25 member of a property owners' association.
26 (2) There have been or shall be recorded restricted covenants governing the use
27 and occupancy of properties in this community.
28 (3) You shall be obligated to pay assessments to the association. Assessments
29 may be subject to periodic change. If applicable, the current amount is $____ per
30 ____. You shall also be obligated to pay any special assessments imposed by the
31 association. Such special assessments may be subject to change. If applicable,
32 the current amount is $___ per ___.
33 (4) You may be obligated to pay special assessments to the respective
34 municipality, county, or special district. All assessments are subject to periodic
35 change.
36 (5) Your failure to pay special assessments or assessments levied by a property
37 owners' association could result in a lien on your property.
38 (6) There may be an obligation or rent or land use fees for recreational or other
39 commonly used facilities as an obligation of membership in the property owners'
40 association. If applicable, the current amount is $___ per ___.
41 (7) The declarant may have the right to amend the restrictive covenants without
42 the approval of the association membership or the approval of the parcel owners.
S. B. 315
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0085
43 (8) The statements contained in this disclosure form are only summary in nature,
44 and, as a prospective lot owner, you should refer to the covenants and the
45 association governing documents before purchasing property.
46 (9) These documents are either matters of public record and can be obtained from
47 the record office in the county where the property is located, or are not recorded
48 and can be obtained from the declarant.'
49 (2) The disclosure shall be supplied by the declarant or by the lot owner if the sale is by
50 a lot owner that is not the declarant. Any contract or agreement for sale shall refer to and
51 incorporate the disclosure summary and shall include, in prominent language, a statement
52 that the potential buyer shall not execute the contract or agreement until he or she has
53 received and read the disclosure summary required by this Code section.
54 (c) Each contract entered into for the sale of a lot governed by covenants subject to
55 disclosure as required by this Code section shall contain in conspicuous type a clause that
56 states:
57 'IF THE DISCLOSURE SUMMARY REQUIRED BY CODE SECTION 44-3-231.1 OF
58 THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED HAS NOT BEEN PROVIDED
59 TO THE PROSPECTIVE PURCHASER BEFORE EXECUTING THIS CONTRACT
60 FOR SALE, THIS CONTRACT IS VOIDABLE BY DELIVERING TO SELLER OR
61 SELLER'S AGENT OR REPRESENTATIVE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S
62 INTENTION TO CANCEL WITHIN 3 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
63 DISCLOSURE SUMMARY OR PRIOR TO CLOSING, WHICHEVER OCCURS
64 FIRST. ANY PURPORTED WAIVER OF THIS VOIDABILITY RIGHT HAS NO
65 EFFECT. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS CONTRACT SHALL TERMINATE AT
66 CLOSING.'
67 (d) If a disclosure summary in a substantially similar form as set forth in subsection (b) of
68 this Code section is not provided to a prospective purchaser before the purchaser executes
69 a contract for the sale of property governed by covenants that are subject to disclosure
S. B. 315
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0085
70 pursuant to this Code section, the purchaser may void the contract by delivering to the
71 seller or the seller's agent or representative written notice cancelling the contract within 3
72 days after receipt of the disclosure summary or prior to closing, whichever occurs first.
73 This right may not be waived by the purchaser but terminates at closing.
74 (e) In addition to the disclosure summary provided in subsection (b) of this Code section,
75 a contract shall be voidable by the buyer until at least seven days after the seller has
76 furnished the prospective lot owner with the documents specified in this subsection. The
77 furnished copy of any such document which shall be executed in order to be effective shall
78 be a copy of such executed document. The documents required under this subsection to
79 be furnished to the prospective buyer are:
80 (1) A copy of the declaration and of each amendment thereto as of the time of purchase;
81 (2) A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the association and of each
82 amendment to either as of the time of purchase;
83 (3) A copy of any management, maintenance, or other contract for the management and
84 operation of the association or the facilities to be used by lot owners having a term in
85 excess of one year. Contracts renewable without the consent of the association shall be
86 deemed to have a term in excess of one year;
87 (4) The estimated or actual operating budget for the association for the current year
88 containing the matters set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and a schedule of
89 estimated or actual expenses pertaining to each lot for the current year containing the
90 matters set forth in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph:
91 (A) Expenses of the association for:
92 (i) Administration;
93 (ii) Management fees;
94 (iii) Maintenance;
95 (iv) Rent for recreational and other commonly used facilities;
96 (v) Taxes on property of the association;
S. B. 315
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0085
97 (vi) Insurance;
98 (vii) Security provisions;
99 (viii) Other expenses;
100 (ix) Operating capital;
101 (x) Reserve for deferred maintenance;
102 (xi) Reserve for depreciation; and
103 (xii) Other reserves; and
104 (B) Expenses required of the lot owner for:
105 (i) Assessments to cover association expenses; and
106 (ii) Rent, fees, or charges payable by the lot owner directly to the lessor or the lessor's
107 agent under any recreational lease or lease for the use of commonly used facilities,
108 which leases are and payment of is a mandatary condition of ownership and which
109 payment is not included in the assessments paid by the lot owner to the association;
110 (5) A copy of any lease of recreational or other facilities that shall be used only by the
111 lot owners;
112 (6) A copy of any lease of recreational or other facilities that shall be used by lot owners
113 in common with any other person; and
114 (7) A copy of a statement setting forth the extent of and conditions or limitations
115 applicable to the declarant's commitment to build and submit additional lots, additional
116 recreational or other facilities, or additional property.
117 (f) The items required by subsection (e) of this Code section shall be bound or stapled into
118 a single package and covered by an index sheet listing each item required by said
119 subsection and showing either that the same is attached or does not exist. A nonrefundable
120 deposit not in excess of $25.00 may be required of the recipient of the documents required
121 by this Code section, such deposit to be applied to the purchase price of the lot in the event
122 of purchase by the prospective lot owner. A dated, written acknowledgment of receipt of
123 all items required by subsection (e) of this Code section, executed by the prospective lot
S. B. 315
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0085
124 owner, shall be prima-facie evidence of the date of delivery of said items. The
125 requirements of subsection (e) of this Code section may not be waived.
126 (g) No contract executed prior to the expiration of seven days after the actual delivery to
127 the prospective lot owner of the items required to be furnished by subsection (e) of this
128 Code section shall be of any force or effect. This subsection may not be waived. The
129 contract shall contain within the text the following, in boldface type or capital letters no
130 smaller than the largest type in the text:
131 'UNLESS ALL OF THE ITEMS REQUIRED UNDER CODE SECTION 44-3-231.1 OF
132 THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED TO BE DELIVERED TO
133 BUYER HAVE BEEN RECEIVED BY BUYER AT LEAST SEVEN DAYS PRIOR TO
134 BUYER'S EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT, THIS CONTRACT IS OF NO FORCE
135 OR EFFECT AND SHALL NOT BE BINDING ON ANY PARTY. THE ITEMS SO
136 REQUIRED ARE: (1) THE DECLARATION AND AMENDMENTS THERETO, (2)
137 THE ASSOCIATION'S ARTICLES AND INCORPORATION AND BYLAWS AND
138 AMENDMENTS THERETO, (3) ANY MANAGEMENT CONTRACT HAVING A
139 TERM IN EXCESS OF ONE YEAR, (4) THE ESTIMATED OR ACTUAL BUDGET
140 FOR THE ASSOCIATION, (5) ANY LEASE OF RECREATIONAL OR OTHER
141 FACILITIES THAT SHALL BE USED ONLY BY THE LOT OWNERS, (6) ANY
142 LEASE OF RECREATIONAL OR OTHER FACILITIES THAT MAY BE USED BY
143 THE LOT OWNER WITH OTHERS, AND (7) A STATEMENT SETTING FORTH
144 THE EXTENT OF THE SELLER'S COMMITMENT TO BUILD OR SUBMIT
145 ADDITIONAL LOTS, ADDITIONAL RECREATIONAL OR OTHER FACILITIES,
146 OR ADDITIONAL PROPERTY. A DATED, WRITTEN ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF
147 RECEIPT OF ALL SAID ITEMS SIGNED BY THE BUYER SHALL BE
148 PRIMA-FACIE EVIDENCE OF THE DATE OF DELIVERY OF SAID ITEMS.'
149 (h) The items required to be furnished or made available to a prospective lot owner under
150 this Code section shall constitute a part of each contract, and no change may be made in
S. B. 315
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0085
151 any such items which would materially affect the rights of the prospective lot owner or the
152 value of the lot without the approval of the prospective lot owner except to the extent that
153 such items by their own terms, by the express terms of such covered contract, or by the
154 provisions of this article may be changed without the consent of any lot owner or
155 prospective lot owner.
156 (i) In addition to the provisions required in this Code section, a contract shall include a
157 caveat in boldface type or capital letters no smaller than the largest type on the page shall
158 be placed upon the first page of the contract in the following words:
159 'ORAL REPRESENTATIONS CANNOT BE RELIED UPON AS CORRECTLY
160 STATING THE REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SELLER. FOR CORRECT
161 REPRESENTATIONS, REFERENCE SHOULD BE MADE TO THIS CONTRACT
162 AND THE DOCUMENTS REQUIRED BY CODE SECTION 44-3-231.1 OF THE
163 OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED TO BE FURNISHED BY A SELLER
164 TO A BUYER.'
165 (j) If any lot is offered for sale prior to the completion of the construction or remodeling
166 of such lot or of improvements of common elements, the seller shall make available to each
167 prospective lot owner for his or her inspection at a place convenient to the site a copy of
168 the existing plans and specifications for the construction or remodeling of such lot and of
169 the improvements of common elements, whichever is not complete at the time of such
170 offering for sale.
171 (k) Any sales brochures describing the association and the lots for sale shall include a
172 description and location of the recreational facilities proposed to be provided by the seller
173 and other commonly used facilities together with a statement indicating:
174 (1) Which of the facilities shall be owned by the lot owners as part of the common
175 elements and which of the facilities shall be owned by others;
176 (2) Whether, with respect to each facility so shown, the seller is obligated to complete
177 the same; and
S. B. 315
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0085
178 (3) The limitations or conditions, if any, on the seller's obligation to complete the same.
179 A caveat in boldface type or capital letters no smaller than the largest type of text material
180 shall be conspicuously placed on the inside front cover of the sales brochure or on the
181 first page containing text material or shall be otherwise conspicuously displayed
182 containing the following words:
183 'ORAL REPRESENTATIONS CANNOT BE RELIED UPON AS CORRECTLY
184 STATING REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SELLER. FOR CORRECT
185 REPRESENTATIONS, REFERENCE SHOULD BE MADE TO THIS BROCHURE
186 AND TO THE DOCUMENTS REQUIRED BY CODE SECTION 44-3-231.1 OF THE
187 OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED TO BE FURNISHED BY THE
188 SELLER TO A BUYER.'
189 (l) Any person who, in reasonable reliance upon any false or misleading material statement
190 or information published by or under authority from the seller in advertising and
191 promotional materials, including, but not limited to, the items required to be furnished by
192 this Code section, brochures, and newspaper advertising, or who, without having been
193 furnished with all of the information required to be furnished by this Code section, pays
194 anything of value toward the purchase of a lot located to this state shall be entitled to bring
195 an action against the seller for damages under this Code section at any time prior to the
196 expiration of one year of the date upon which the last of the events described in
197 paragraphs (1) through (5) of this subsection shall occur:
198 (1) The closing of the transaction;
199 (2) The first issuance by the applicable governmental authority of a certificate of
200 occupancy or other evidence of sufficient completion of construction of the lot to allow
201 lawful occupancy of the lot. In counties or municipalities in which certificates of
202 occupancy or other evidence of completion sufficient to allow lawful occupancy are not
203 customarily issued, for the purposes of this Code section, evidence of lawful occupancy
S. B. 315
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0085
204 shall be deemed to have been given or issued upon the date that such lawful occupancy
205 of the lot may first be allowed under prevailing applicable laws, ordinances, or statutes;
206 (3) The completion of the common elements and any recreational facilities, whether or
207 not the same are common elements, which the seller is obligated to complete or to
208 provide under the terms of the written contract for the sale of the lot;
209 (4) As to claims relating to the common elements and other portions of the association
210 which are the responsibility of the association to maintain, the date upon which the
211 declarant's right to control the association terminates; and
212 (5) In the event there is no written contract for the sale of the lot, then the completion of
213 common elements and such recreational facilities, whether or not the same are common
214 elements, which the seller would be obligated to complete under any rule of law
215 applicable to the seller's obligation.
216 (m) Under no circumstances shall a cause of action created or recognized under this Code
217 section survive for a period of more than five years after the closing of the transaction.
218 Any person who has a right of action for damages as provided in this Code section shall
219 have the additional right to rescind any contract for the purchase of a lot at any time prior
220 to the closing of the transaction. In any action for relief under this Code section, the
221 prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees.
222 (n) Willful violation of any of the requirements of this Code section by the declarant, the
223 seller, any sales agent or broker, or any other person shall result in a fine of $1,000.00."
224 SECTION 2.
225 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all lot sales made on or
226 after such date.
227 SECTION 3.
228 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 315
- 9 -